Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB419.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 95A.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, "chief fire officer" means an individual who plays an essential role in the
administrative structure of his or her fire department.
(2) There is hereby created the Kentucky Fire Commission, hereinafter called "commission," which shall be
attached to the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for administrative purposes only.
(3) (a) The commission shall include male, female, and racial minority representation.
(b) No more than three (3) appointed members shall reside in the same congressional district.
(4) The commission shall be composed of eighteen (18)[fourteen (14)] members who are[,] residents of the State
of Kentucky[,] and appointed by the Governor, as applicable. These members should be persons well qualified
by experience or education in the field of fire protection or related fields.
(5) The membership of the commission shall include:
(a) One (1) member of a fire department formed under KRS Chapter 75 or 273 who is:
1. Not a chief fire officer;
2. Not a career employee of any department other than the one from which he or she is nominated;
and
3. Selected from a list of at least three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Firefighters
Association;
(b) One (1) member of a volunteer fire department who is:
1. Not a chief fire officer;
2. Not a career employee of any fire department other than the one from which he or she is
nominated; and
3. Selected from a list of at least three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Firefighters
Association;
(c) One (1) member of a fire department formed under KRS Chapter 95 selected from a list of at least[list]
three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Professional Firefighters;
(d) One (1) chief fire officer of a paid fire department selected from a list of at least three (3) names
submitted by the Kentucky Association of Fire Chiefs;
(e) One (1) licensed physician with experience in emergency medicine;
(f) A chief fire officer of a volunteer fire department who is not a career member of any other department,
selected from a list of at least three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Fire Chiefs;
(g) One (1) member of a fire department formed under KRS Chapter 67 or 75, or a fire department in a
county containing an urban-county government created pursuant to KRS Chapter 67A, who is selected
from a list of at least three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Professional Firefighters;
(h) The director of Homeland Security or his or her designee;
(i) One (1) mayor or other officer of a Kentucky city providing fire services under KRS Chapter 95
selected from a list of at least three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky League of Cities;
(j) One (1) county judge/executive or other officer of a Kentucky county selected from a list of at least
three (3) names submitted by the Kentucky Association of Counties;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(k) One (1) representative of a Kentucky building, industry, or safety association;
(l) One (1) representative of the general public who is not an employee of any government or
governmental agency;
(m) The state fire marshal or his or her designee;[ and]
(n) One (1) officer of a fire-based emergency medical service selected from a list of at least three (3) names
submitted by the executive director of the Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services;
(o) The president of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or his or her designee;
(p) The president of the Kentucky Firefighters Association or his or her designee;
(q) The president of the Kentucky Professional Firefighters or his or her designee; and
(r) The president of the Kentucky Association of Fire Chiefs or his or her designee.
(6) [The vice president of administrative services of the Kentucky Community and Technical College System,
president of the Kentucky Firefighters Association, president of the Kentucky Professional Firefighters, and
president of the Kentucky Association of Fire Chiefs, or their designees, shall serve as nonvoting ex officio
members of the commission.
(7) ]The members of the commission who are firefighters shall possess a minimum of five (5) years of fire service
experience and shall be certified with the following:
(a) One hundred fifty (150) hours of training for volunteer firefighters; or
(b) Four hundred (400) hours of training for professional firefighters.
(7)[(8)] The Kentucky Firefighters Association, Kentucky Professional Firefighters, Kentucky Association of
Fire Chiefs, Kentucky Board of Emergency Medical Services Association, Kentucky League of Cities, and
Kentucky Association of Counties shall submit their lists of nominees by November 15 of each year as
vacancies occur.[
(9) The Governor shall appoint members of the commission to staggered terms not to exceed four (4) years.
However, initial appointments shall be appointed as follows:
(a) Four (4) members shall serve for two (2) year terms ending November 30, 2021;
(b) Five (5) members shall serve three (3) year terms ending November 30, 2022; and
(c) Five (5) members shall serve four (4) year terms ending November 30, 2023.]
(8) (a)[(10) After the expiration of the initial appointments, ]Appointive members shall be appointed by the
Governor under subsection (5)(a) to (g), (i) to (l), and (n) of this section for a term of four (4) years.
(b) The terms of the members set out in subsection (5)(h), (m), and (o) to (r) of this section shall be
concurrent with and by virtue of his or her office.
(c) Any member chosen by the Governor to fill a vacancy created otherwise than by expiration of term
shall be appointed for the unexpired term of the member he or she is chosen to succeed.
(9)[(11)] When vacancies occur other than by expiration of term and nominations are required, the Governor may
request a new list or select an appointee from a previously submitted list. Appointive members shall not serve
more than two (2) consecutive four (4) year terms.
(10)[(12)] A majority of the voting members appointed to the commission shall constitute a quorum. The
commission shall:
(a) Meet at least four (4) times per year upon call of the chair, or upon the written request of any five (5)
members; and
(b) Annually elect a chair, vice chair, and secretary in accordance with KRS 95A.030.
(11)[(13)] A member of the commission who misses three (3) regular meetings, without the approval of the
chairman, in one (1) year shall be deemed to have resigned from the commission and his or her position shall
be deemed to be vacant. As used in this subsection, a "year" begins when the first meeting is missed and ends
three hundred sixty-five (365) days later or when the third meeting is missed, whichever occurs first. The
Governor shall appoint a similarly qualified person to fill the vacancy within ninety (90) days of the vacancy
occurring. The failure of a commission member to attend a special or emergency meeting shall not result in

CHAPTER 111 3
any penalty. A person removed under this subsection shall not be reappointed to the commission for at least
ten (10) years after removal.
(12)[(14)] Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be allowed their
actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their functions.
Section 2. KRS 95A.262 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The Kentucky Fire Commission shall, in cooperation with the Cabinet for Health and Family Services,
develop and implement a continuing program to inoculate every paid and volunteer firefighter in
Kentucky against hepatitis A and B.
(b) The program shall be funded from revenues allocated to the Firefighters Foundation Program fund
pursuant to KRS 136.392 and 42.190, not to exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per fiscal
year.
(c) Program funds in excess of the costs of inoculating firefighters under paragraph (a) of this
subsection may be used to reimburse firefighters for out-of-pocket expenses for cancer screenings
under subsection (16)(h) of this section.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the Kentucky Fire Commission shall allot on an
annual basis a share of the funds accruing to and appropriated for volunteer fire department aid to
volunteer fire departments in cities of all classes, fire protection districts organized pursuant to KRS
Chapter 75, county districts established under authority of KRS 67.083, and volunteer fire departments
created as nonprofit corporations pursuant to KRS Chapter 273.
(b) The commission shall allot eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) annually to each qualifying department.
(c) Any qualifying department which fails to participate satisfactorily in the Kentucky fire incident
reporting system as described in KRS 304.13-380 shall forfeit annually five hundred dollars ($500) of
its allotment.
(d) If two (2) or more qualified volunteer fire departments, as defined in KRS 95A.500 to 95A.560, merge
after January 1, 2000, then the allotment shall be in accordance with the provisions of KRS 95A.500 to
95A.560.
(e) Administrative regulations for determining qualifications shall be based on the number of both paid
firefighters and volunteer firemen within a volunteer fire department, the amount of equipment, housing
facilities available, and any other matters or standards that will best effect the purposes of the volunteer
fire department aid law. A qualifying department shall:
1. Include at least twelve (12) firefighters;
2. Have a chief;
3. Have at least one (1) operational fire apparatus or one (1) on order; and
4. Have at least fifty percent (50%) of its firefighters who have completed at least one-half (1/2) of
one hundred fifty (150) training hours, or as otherwise established by the commission under KRS
95A.240(6), toward certification within the first six (6) months of the first year of the
department's application for certification, and there shall be a plan to complete the one hundred
fifty (150) training hours, or as otherwise established by the commission by KRS 95A.240(6),
within the second year.
These personnel, equipment, and training requirements shall not be made more stringent by the
promulgation of administrative regulations.
(f) No allotment shall exceed the total value of the funds, equipment, lands, and buildings made available
to the local fire units from any source whatever for the year in which the allotment is made.
(g) A portion of the funds provided for above may be used to purchase group or blanket health insurance
and shall be used to purchase workers' compensation insurance, and the remaining funds shall be
distributed as provided in this section.
(3) There shall be allotted two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) of the insurance premium surcharge proceeds
accruing to the Firefighters Foundation Program fund that shall be allocated each fiscal year of the biennium to
the firefighters training center fund, which is hereby created and established, for the purposes of constructing
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
new or upgrading existing training centers for firefighters. If any moneys in the training center fund remain
uncommitted, unobligated, or unexpended at the close of the first fiscal year of the biennium, then such
moneys shall be carried forward to the second fiscal year of the biennium, and shall be reallocated to and for
the use of the training center fund, in addition to the second fiscal year's allocation of two hundred thousand
dollars ($200,000). Prior to funding any project pursuant to this subsection, a proposed project shall be
approved by the Kentucky Fire Commission as provided in subsection (4) of this section and shall comply
with state laws applicable to capital construction projects.
(4) Applications for funding low-interest loans and firefighters' training centers shall be submitted to the Kentucky
Fire Commission for their recommendation, approval, disapproval, or modification. The commission shall
review applications periodically, and shall, subject to funds available, recommend which applications shall be
funded and at what levels, together with any terms and conditions the commission deems necessary.
(5) Any department or entity eligible for and receiving funding pursuant to this section shall have a minimum of
fifty percent (50%) of its personnel certified as recognized by the Kentucky Fire Commission.
(6) Upon the written request of any department, the Kentucky Fire Commission shall make available a certified
training program in a county of which such department is located.
(7) The commission shall reimburse the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for salaries and
other costs of administering funds as set out in this section, and the reimbursement shall be considered a
part of the reimbursement described in KRS 95A.240(3). The reimbursement set out in this subsection and
all other reimbursements associated with administering the fund shall not collectively exceed five percent
(5%) of the total appropriation to the fund for that year as set out in KRS 95A.240(3)[The amount of
reimbursement for any given year for costs incurred by the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System for administering these funds, including but not limited to the expenses and costs of commission
operations, shall be determined by the commission and shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount
of moneys accruing to the Firefighters Foundation Program fund which are allotted for the purposes specified
in this section during any fiscal year].
(8) The commission shall withhold from the general distribution of funds under subsection (2) of this section an
amount which it deems sufficient to reimburse volunteer fire departments for equipment lost or damaged
beyond repair due to hazardous material incidents.
(9) Moneys withheld pursuant to subsection (8) of this section shall be distributed only under the following terms
and conditions:
(a) A volunteer fire department has lost or damaged beyond repair items of personal protective clothing or
equipment due to that equipment having been lost or damaged as a result of an incident in which a
hazardous material (as defined in any state or federal statute or regulation) was the causative agent of
the loss;
(b) The volunteer fire department has made application in writing to the commission for reimbursement in
a manner approved by the commission and the loss and the circumstances thereof have been verified by
the commission;
(c) The loss of or damage to the equipment has not been reimbursed by the person responsible for the
hazardous materials incident or by any other person;
(d) The commission has determined that the volunteer fire department does not have the fiscal resources to
replace the equipment;
(e) The commission has determined that the equipment sought to be replaced is immediately necessary to
protect the lives of the volunteer firefighters of the fire department;
(f) The fire department has agreed in writing to subrogate all claims for and rights to reimbursement for the
lost or damaged equipment to the Commonwealth to the extent that the Commonwealth provides
reimbursement to the department; and
(g) The department has shown to the satisfaction of the commission that it has made reasonable attempts to
secure reimbursement for its losses from the person responsible for the hazardous materials incident and
has been unsuccessful in the effort.
(10) If a volunteer fire department has met all of the requirements of subsection (9) of this section, the commission
may authorize a reimbursement of equipment losses not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or the actual
amount of the loss, whichever is less.

CHAPTER 111 5
(11) Moneys which have been withheld during any fiscal year which remain unexpended at the end of the fiscal
year shall be distributed in the normal manner required by subsection (2) of this section during the following
fiscal year.
(12) No volunteer fire department may receive funding for equipment losses more than once during any fiscal year.
(13) The commission shall make reasonable efforts to secure reimbursement from the responsible party for any
moneys awarded to a fire department pursuant to this section.
(14) The commission, in accordance with the procedures in subsection (4) of this section, may make low-interest
loans, and the interest thereon shall not exceed three percent (3%) annually or the amount needed to sustain
operating expenses of the loan fund, whichever is less, to volunteer fire departments for the purposes of major
equipment purchases and facility construction. Loans shall be made to departments which achieve the training
standards necessary to qualify for volunteer fire department aid allotted pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, and which do not have other sources of funds at rates which are favorable given their financial
resources. The proceeds of loan payments shall be returned to the loan fund for the purpose of providing future
loans. If a department does not make scheduled loan payments, the commission may withhold any grants
payable to the department pursuant to subsection (2) of this section until the department is current on its
payments. Money in the low-interest loan fund shall be used only for the purposes specified in this subsection.
Any funds remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year for
the purposes of the fund.
(15) Each fiscal year there shall be allotted one million dollars ($1,000,000) from the fund established in KRS
95A.220 to be used by the commission to conduct training-related activities.
(16) If funding is available from the fund established in KRS 95A.220, the Kentucky Fire Commission may
implement the following:
(a) A program to prepare emergency service personnel for handling potential man-made and non-man-
made threats. The commission shall work in conjunction with the state fire marshal and other
appropriate agencies and associations to identify and make maps of gas transmission and hazardous
liquids pipelines in the state;
(b) A program to provide and maintain a mobile test facility in each training region established by the
Kentucky Fire Commission with equipment to administer Comprehensive Physical Aptitude Tests
(CPAT) to ascertain a firefighter's ability to perform the physical requirements necessary to be an
effective and safe firefighter;
(c) A program to provide defensive driving training tactics to firefighters. The commission shall purchase,
instruct in the use of, and maintain mobile equipment in each of the training regions, and fund expenses
related to equipment replacement;
(d) A program to annually evaluate equipment adequacy and to provide for annual physical examinations
for instructors, adequate protective clothing and personal equipment to meet NFPA guidelines, and to
establish procedures for replacing this equipment as needed;
(e) A program to establish a rotational expansion and replacement program for mobile fleet equipment
currently used for training and recertification of fire departments;
(f) A program to expand and update current emergency medical services, emergency medical responder,
emergency medical technician, advanced emergency medical technician, and paramedic training and
certification instruction;
(g) A program to purchase thermal vision and other technical devices to comply with the provisions of
KRS 95A.400 to 95A.440; and
(h) A program to reimburse firefighters for out-of-pocket expenses for cancer screenings in accordance
with subsection (1) of this section. The commission may promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to:
1. Establish a periodic cap and maximum on the reimbursement to the firefighter seeking
reimbursement;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2. Establish which cancer screening tests are eligible for reimbursement, provided that only cancer
screening tests approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for cancer detection
in humans may be reimbursed;
3. Determine eligibility requirements for participants, which in the discretion of the commission
may also include retired firefighters; and
4. Establish any other policy to effect the purposes of this program.
Section 3. KRS 95A.400 is amended to read as follows:
The Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program, which is administered pursuant to KRS 95A.400 to
95A.440 and appropriations for the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program in the state budget, is
designed to:
(1) Reduce and prevent the loss of life by creating better equipped firefighters throughout the Commonwealth; and
(2) Upgrade the capabilities of local firefighters by providing financial assistance to be used to purchase thermal
vision and other technical devices.
Section 4. KRS 95A.410 is amended to read as follows:
The commission shall have overall responsibility for policy, guidance, administration, implementation, and proper
utilization of the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program. The commission, with the advice of the
grant[advisory] committee, shall make determinations relating to Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant
Program applications and releasing equipment to fire departments.
Section 5. KRS 95A.420 is amended to read as follows:
As used in[For the purposes of] KRS 95A.400 to 95A.440:[, ]
(a) "Automated external defibrillator" has the same meaning as in KRS 311.666;
(b) "Gas monitor" means a portable device that detects and measures the concentration of one (1) or
more gases, and includes four (4) gas monitors and multi-gas monitors;
(c) "Technical device" means an:
1. Automated external defibrillator;
2. Gas monitor; or
3. Thermal vision device; and
(d) "Thermal vision device" means any portable electronic device that displays a visible image from the
infrared portion of the electromagnetic spectrum.
Section 6. KRS 95A.430 is amended to read as follows:
The commission shall:
(1) Create the necessary application forms, any necessary supporting documents, compliance documents, or
reporting documents for the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program as may be necessary
by promulgating administrative regulations in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A;
(2) Make a determination of the characteristics of the most cost-effective technical devices[thermal vision
systems] for use by fire departments participating in the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant
Program;
(3) Make a determination of the manufacturer or manufacturers of technical[thermal vision] devices to be
purchased by the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program;
(4) Make a determination of the most cost-effective purchase mechanism and price, under KRS Chapter 45A, for
technical devices[thermal vision systems];
(5) Accept and process applications for the purchase of technical devices[thermal vision systems] through the
Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program;
(6) Award eligible fire departments grants equal to fifty percent (50%), but not to exceed the sum of five thousand
dollars ($5,000), of the agreed price for the purchase of technical devices[thermal vision systems];

CHAPTER 111 7
(7) Require recipients of technical[thermal vision] devices purchased through the Thermal Vision and Technical
Innovation Grant Program to file any reports deemed necessary by the commission concerning usage,
maintenance, or property accounting or loss with the commission; and
(8) Maintain these reports for evaluation by the commission.
Section 7. KRS 95A.440 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All fire departments formed under KRS Chapter 65, 75, 95, or 273 shall be eligible to receive grants through
the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program. These fire departments may make application
for a grant to purchase technical[thermal vision] devices through the Thermal Vision and Technical
Innovation Grant Program to the commission. The application shall be made on forms provided by the
commission.
(2) A fire department that receives a grant through the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program
shall not make another application to the commission for a grant for a period of two (2) years.
(3) Fire departments receiving grants for the purchase of technical[thermal vision] devices through the Thermal
Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program shall comply with all administrative regulations concerning
reporting requirements established by the commission. Failure to comply with these reporting requirements
shall disqualify a fire department from participation in the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant
Program for a period of five (5) years.
Section 8. KRS 95A.055 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Fire district" means any fire protection district or volunteer fire department district operating under
KRS Chapter 75 with the higher of annual receipts from all sources or annual expenditures of less than
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000); and
(b) "Nonprofit fire department" means any fire department incorporated under KRS Chapter 273.
(2) If a fire district's annual revenues or expenditures equals or exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000)
for two (2) consecutive fiscal years, then the fire district shall, for the next reporting period and any subsequent
reporting period for which it exceeds that amount, be considered a special purpose governmental entity as
defined in KRS 65A.010 and shall comply with KRS Chapter 65A until its annual revenues or expenditures
are less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), whereupon it may again qualify as a fire department
under this section.
(3) Each fire district shall for each fiscal year beginning on and after July 1, 2016, annually submit to the
commission the information required by this section. The information shall be submitted at the time and in the
form and format required by the commission. The information submitted shall include at a minimum the
following:
(a) Administrative information:
1. The name, address, and, if applicable, the term and appointing authority for each board member
of the governing body of the fire district;
2. The fiscal year of the fire district;
3. The Kentucky Revised Statute and, if applicable, the local government ordinance under which
the fire district was established; the date of establishment; the establishing entity; and the statute
or statutes, local government ordinance, or interlocal agreement under which the fire district
operates, if different from the statute or statutes, ordinance, or agreement under which it was
established;
4. The mailing address and telephone number and, if applicable, the Web site uniform resource
locator (URL) of the fire district;
5. The operational boundaries and service area of the fire district and the services provided by the
fire district;
6. A listing of the taxes or fees imposed and collected by the fire district, including the rates or
amounts charged for the reporting period and the statutory or other source of authority for the
levy of the tax or fee;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
7. The primary contact for the fire district for purposes of communication with the commission;
8. The code of ethics that applies to the fire district, and whether the fire district has adopted
additional ethics provisions;
9. A listing of all federal, state, and local governmental entities that have oversight authority over
the fire district or to which the fire district submits reports, data, or information; and
10. Any other related administrative information required by the commission; and
(b) Financial information including budgets and financial expenditure information that are designed to
ensure that all public funds received by the fire districts are being responsibly used. The commission
shall, through the promulgation of an administrative regulation, establish the specific financial
information that shall be filed to meet the requirements of this paragraph.
(4) The commission shall review the reports required for fire districts by this section and, if the commission finds
that a report submitted does not comply with the requirements established by this section and regulations
promulgated hereunder, the commission shall notify the fire district in writing. The notification shall include a
description of the specific deficiencies identified, and shall describe the process the fire district shall follow to
correct the deficiencies, including the time within which a response must be provided.
(5) The commission shall ensure that every fire district or nonprofit fire department shall at least once every
twelve (12) months be subject to a financial review that shall include procedures developed by the commission
and approved by the Auditor of Public Accounts in advance. Subsequent changes to these procedures shall
also be approved by the Auditor of Public Accounts prior to the period in which they are performed.
(6) The commission may require any fire district or nonprofit fire department with the higher of annual receipts
from all sources or annual expenditures equal to or greater than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) but
less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to once every four (4) years be subject to an independent
audit in the manner specified in KRS 65A.030(2).
(7) The commission shall ensure that every fire district or nonprofit fire department with the higher of annual
receipts from all sources or annual expenditures equal to or greater than five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) for two (2) consecutive fiscal years is audited annually in the manner specified in KRS 65A.030(2)
until its annual revenues or expenditures are less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(8) The Auditor of Public Accounts may, upon request, examine and review the reports and all related work
papers and documents relating to a financial review or audit under this section.
(9) If a fire district or nonprofit fire department fails to comply with this section or KRS 75.430, then the
commission may withhold:
(a) Incentive pay to qualified firefighters under KRS 95A.250;
(b) Volunteer fire department aid, funds used to purchase workers' compensation insurance for fire districts
and nonprofit fire departments, and the low-interest loans under KRS 95A.262;
(c) Funds from the Thermal Vision and Technical Innovation Grant Program under KRS 95A.400 to
95A.440; and
(d) Any other funds that the commission controls.
(10) The commission shall report any irregularities relating to the finances or operations of a fire district or
nonprofit fire department that it identifies to the Attorney General and Auditor of Public Accounts, and the
commission may notify any other public official with jurisdiction over fire districts or nonprofit fire
departments for further investigation and follow-up.
(11) The commission may prescribe corrective actions to bring fire districts or nonprofit fire departments that are,
as of July 15, 2016, not in compliance with KRS Chapter 65A into compliance with this section. Any
sanctions imposed by the Department for Local Government prior to July 15, 2016, shall be lifted upon
notification by the commission to the department that the fire district or nonprofit fire department in question
has complied with the corrective actions prescribed by the commission.
(12) The information reported by fire districts or nonprofit fire departments under this section shall be considered
public records under KRS 61.872 to 61.884. The commission shall prominently post on its Web site the
availability of the information required by this section and shall provide contact information and procedures
for obtaining copies of the information.

CHAPTER 111 9
(13) The commission shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with[under] KRS Chapter 13A as
soon as practicable after July 15, 2016, to implement this section and KRS 75.430.
(14) By October 1, 2016, and on or before each October 1 thereafter, the commission shall file an annual report
with the Legislative Research Commission detailing the compliance of the fire districts or nonprofit fire
departments required to report under this section with subsection (3) of this section. The Legislative Research
Commission shall refer the report to the Interim Joint Committee on Local Government for review.
Signed by Governor April 13, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version